Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 43, article 1, section 2, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 126, article 1, section 1, and Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 9, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Agriculture, Bioenergy, and Bioproduct Advancement 34,034,000 38,159,000 (a) $10,702,000 the first year and $10,702,000 the second year are for the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14. Except as provided below, the appropriation each year is for transfer to the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer account under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3, and the commissioner shall transfer funds each year to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14. To the extent practicable, money expended under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clauses (1) and (2), must supplement and not supplant existing sources and levels of funding. The commissioner may use up to one percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Of the amount appropriated for the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14: (1) $600,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year are for the Minnesota Agricultural Experiment Station's agriculture rapid response fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clause (2); (2) up to $1,000,000 the first year and up to $1,000,000 the second year are for research on avian influenza, salmonella, and other turkey-related diseases and disease prevention measures; (3) $2,250,000 the first year and $2,250,000 the second year are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Education Leadership Council to enhance agricultural education with priority given to Farm Business Management challenge grants; (4) $450,000 the first year is for the cultivated wild rice breeding project at the North Central Research and Outreach Center to include a tenure track/research associate plant breeder; (5) $350,000 the first year and $350,000 the second year are for potato breeding; (6) $802,000 the first year and $802,000 the second year are to fund the Forever Green Initiative and protect the state's natural resources while increasing the efficiency, profitability, and productivity of Minnesota farmers by incorporating perennial and winter-annual crops into existing agricultural practices. The base for the allocation under this clause is $802,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter. By February 1 each year, the dean of the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy and higher education detailing uses of the funds in this paragraph, including administrative costs, and the achievements these funds contributed to; (7) $350,000 each year is for farm-scale winter greenhouse research and development coordinated by University of Minnesota Extension Regional Sustainable Development Partnerships. The allocation in this clause is onetime; (8) $200,000 the second year is for research on natural stands of wild rice; and (9) $250,000 the second year is for the cultivated wild rice forward selection project at the North Central Research and Outreach Center, including a tenure track or research associate plant scientist. (b) The base for the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer program is $10,352,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,352,000 in fiscal year 2027. (c) $23,332,000 the first year is for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. Except as provided below, the commissioner may allocate this appropriation among the following areas: facilitating the start-up, modernization, improvement, or expansion of livestock operations, including beginning and transitioning livestock operations with preference given to robotic dairy-milking equipment; assisting value-added agricultural businesses to begin or expand, to access new markets, or to diversify, including aquaponics systems, with preference given to hemp fiber processing equipment; facilitating the start-up, modernization, or expansion of other beginning and transitioning farms, including by providing loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 41B.056; sustainable agriculture on-farm research and demonstration; the development or expansion of food hubs and other alternative community-based food distribution systems; enhancing renewable energy infrastructure and use; crop research, including basic and applied turf seed research; Farm Business Management tuition assistance; and good agricultural practices and good handling practices certification assistance. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Of the amount appropriated for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12: (1) $1,000,000 the first year is for distribution in equal amounts to each of the state's county fairs to preserve and promote Minnesota agriculture; (2) $5,750,000 the first year is for incentive payments under Minnesota Statutes, sections 41A.16, 41A.17, 41A.18, and 41A.20. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the first year appropriation is available until June 30, 2025. If this appropriation exceeds the total amount for which all producers are eligible in a fiscal year, the balance of the appropriation is available for other purposes under this paragraph; (3) $3,375,000 the first year is for grants that enable retail petroleum dispensers, fuel storage tanks, and other equipment to dispense biofuels to the public in accordance with the biofuel replacement goals established under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.7911. A retail petroleum dispenser selling petroleum for use in spark ignition engines for vehicle model years after 2000 is eligible for grant money under this clause if the retail petroleum dispenser has no more than 10 retail petroleum dispensing sites and each site is located in Minnesota. The grant money must be used to replace or upgrade equipment that does not have the ability to be certified for E25. A grant award must not exceed 65 percent of the cost of the appropriate technology. A grant award must not exceed $200,000 per station. The commissioner must cooperate with biofuel stakeholders in the implementation of the grant program. The commissioner, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which the commissioner contracts, must submit a report on the biofuels infrastructure financial assistance program by January 15 of each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The annual report must include but not be limited to a summary of the following metrics: (i) the number and types of projects financed; (ii) the amount of dollars leveraged or matched per project; (iii) the geographic distribution of financed projects; (iv) any market expansion associated with upgraded infrastructure; (v) the demographics of the areas served; (vi) the costs of the program; and (vii) the number of grants to minority-owned or female-owned businesses; (4) $1,250,000 the first year is for grants to facilitate the start-up, modernization, or expansion of meat, poultry, egg, and milk processing facilities. A grant award under this clause must not exceed $200,000. Any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year does not cancel until June 30, 2026, and may be used for other purposes under this paragraph; (5) $1,150,000 the first year is for providing more fruits, vegetables, meat, poultry, grain, and dairy for children in school and early childhood education settings, including, at the commissioner's discretion, providing grants to reimburse schools and early childhood education and child care providers for purchasing equipment and agricultural products. Organizations must participate in the National School Lunch Program or the Child and Adult Care Food Program to be eligible. Of the amount appropriated, $150,000 is for a statewide coordinator of farm-to-institution strategy and programming. The coordinator must consult with relevant stakeholders and provide technical assistance and training for participating farmers and eligible grant recipients; (6) $2,000,000 the first year is for urban youth agricultural education or urban agriculture community development; (7) $1,000,000 the first year is for the good food access program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1017; and (8) $225,000 the first year is to provide grants to secondary career and technical education programs for the purpose of offering instruction in meat cutting and butchery. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation. Grants may be used for costs, including but not limited to: (i) equipment required for a meat cutting program; (ii) facility renovation to accommodate meat cutting; and (iii) training faculty to teach the fundamentals of meat processing. A grant recipient may be awarded a grant of up to $75,000 and may use up to ten percent of the grant for faculty training. Priority may be given to applicants who are coordinating with meat cutting and butchery programs at Minnesota State Colleges and Universities institutions or with local industry partners. By January 15, 2025, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and education finance by listing the grants made under this paragraph by county and noting the number and amount of grant requests not fulfilled. The report may include additional information as determined by the commissioner, including but not limited to information regarding the outcomes produced by these grants. If additional grants are awarded under this paragraph that were not covered in the report due by January 15, 2025, the commissioner must submit an additional report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and education finance regarding all grants issued under this paragraph by November 1, 2025. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year, and appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2025, for agricultural growth, research, and innovation grants are available until June 30, 2028. (d) $27,457,000 the second year is for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. Except as provided below, the commissioner may allocate this appropriation among the following areas: facilitating the start-up, modernization, improvement, or expansion of livestock operations, including beginning and transitioning livestock operations with preference given to robotic dairy-milking equipment; assisting value-added agricultural businesses to begin or expand, to access new markets, or to diversify, including aquaponics systems, with preference given to hemp fiber processing equipment; facilitating the start-up, modernization, or expansion of other beginning and transitioning farms, including by providing loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 41B.056; sustainable agriculture on-farm research and demonstration; the development or expansion of food hubs and other alternative community-based food distribution systems; enhancing renewable energy infrastructure and use; crop research, including basic and applied turf seed research; Farm Business Management tuition assistance; and good agricultural practices and good handling practices certification assistance. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Of the amount appropriated for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12: (1) $1,000,000 the second year is for distribution in equal amounts to each of the state's county fairs to preserve and promote Minnesota agriculture; (2) $5,750,000 the second year is for incentive payments under Minnesota Statutes, sections 41A.16, 41A.17, 41A.18, and 41A.20. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. If this appropriation exceeds the total amount for which all producers are eligible in a fiscal year, the balance of the appropriation is available for other purposes under this paragraph. The base under this clause is $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter; (3) $3,375,000 the second year is for grants that enable retail petroleum dispensers, fuel storage tanks, and other equipment to dispense biofuels to the public in accordance with the biofuel replacement goals established under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.7911. A retail petroleum dispenser selling petroleum for use in spark ignition engines for vehicle model years after 2000 is eligible for grant money under this clause if the retail petroleum dispenser has no more than ten retail petroleum dispensing sites and each site is located in Minnesota. The grant money must be used to replace or upgrade equipment that does not have the ability to be certified for E25. A grant award must not exceed 65 percent of the cost of the appropriate technology. A grant award must not exceed $200,000 per station. The commissioner must cooperate with biofuel stakeholders in the implementation of the grant program. The commissioner, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which the commissioner contracts, must submit a report on the biofuels infrastructure financial assistance program by January 15 of each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The annual report must include but not be limited to a summary of the following metrics: (i) the number and types of projects financed; (ii) the amount of money leveraged or matched per project; (iii) the geographic distribution of financed projects; (iv) any market expansion associated with upgraded infrastructure; (v) the demographics of the areas served; (vi) the costs of the program; and (vii) the number of grants to minority-owned or female-owned businesses. The base under this clause is $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter; (4) $1,250,000 the second year is for grants to facilitate the start-up, modernization, or expansion of meat, poultry, egg, and milk processing facilities. A grant award under this clause must not exceed $200,000. Any unencumbered balance at the end of the second year does not cancel until June 30, 2027, and may be used for other purposes under this paragraph. The base under this clause is $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter; (5) $1,275,000 the second year is for providing more fruits, vegetables, meat, poultry, grain, and dairy for children in school and early childhood education settings, including, at the commissioner's discretion, providing grants to reimburse schools and early childhood education and child care providers for purchasing equipment and agricultural products. Organizations must participate in the National School Lunch Program or the Child and Adult Care Food Program to be eligible. Of the amount appropriated, $150,000 is for a statewide coordinator of farm-to-institution strategy and programming. The coordinator must consult with relevant stakeholders and provide technical assistance and training for participating farmers and eligible grant recipients. The base under this clause is $1,294,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter; (6) $4,000,000 the second year is for Dairy Assistance, Investment, Relief Initiative (DAIRI) grants and other forms of financial assistance to Minnesota dairy farms that enroll in coverage under a federal dairy risk protection program and produced no more than 16,000,000 pounds of milk in 2022. new text begin New dairy farms that did not market milk during 2022 or for only a portion of 2022 are eligible. new text end The commissioner must make DAIRI payments based on the amount of milk produced in 2022, up to 5,000,000 pounds per participating farm, at a rate determined by the commissioner within the limits of available funding. new text begin For new dairy farms that did not market milk during 2022 or for only a portion of 2022, the commissioner must make DAIRI payments based on the farm's production history as established in its dairy risk protection program enrollment. new text end Any unencumbered balance deleted text begin ondeleted text end new text begin afternew text end June 30, 2026, may be used for other purposes under this paragraph. The allocation in this clause is onetime; (7) $2,000,000 the second year is for urban youth agricultural education or urban agriculture community development; (8) $1,000,000 the second year is for the good food access program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1017; and (9) $225,000 the second year is for the protecting livestock grant program for producers to support the installation of measures to prevent the transmission of avian influenza. For the appropriation in this paragraph, a grant applicant must document a cost-share of 20 percent. An applicant's cost-share amount may be reduced up to $2,000 to cover time and labor costs. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. (e) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriation in paragraph (d) does not cancel at the end of the second year and is available until June 30, 2027. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for agricultural growth, research, and innovation grants are available until June 30, 2030. (f) The base for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program is $17,582,000 in fiscal year 2026 and each year thereafter and includes $200,000 each year for cooperative development grants. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end